Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20266-103
Scope.

The Uniform Assignment for Benefit of Creditors Act applies to an assignment made by an assignor that is:

(1) an organization whose principal place of business is in this state;

(2) an organization whose internal affairs are governed by other law of this state;

(3) an individual whose principal residence is in this state;

(4) an organization wholly owned, directly or indirectly, by an assignor that satisfies subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of this section; or

(5) an organization that:

(A) is partly owned, directly or indirectly, and controlled by an assignor that satisfies subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of this section;

(B) has no place of business or employees; and

(C) relies on the services the organization receives from an assignor that satisfies subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of this section.

Laws 2026, LB783, § 3.
July 18, 2026